Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2283.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; N9003 bridge project; exemption A. The sum of $6,100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the Navajo department of transportation for the N9003 bridge project in Greasewood Springs. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.